Massachusetts, session 194th, H2506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 94I the 
following chapter:- 
CHAPTER 94J. REMOVING CERTAIN CRIMINAL PENALTIES RELATED TO 
PSILOCYBIN NOT MEDICALLY PRESCRIBED 
SECTION 1. The following words, unless a different meaning is required by the context, 
or is specifically described, shall have the following meanings:— 
“Qualifying condition” means a medical condition for which at least two and a majority 
of relevant clinical studies suggest psilocybin therapy in a clinical environment is safe and 
tolerable and which is not a disqualifying condition.  
“Disqualifying condition” means a bipolar disorder, a schizophrenia spectrum disorder, a 
Cluster A personality disorder, a Cluster B personality disorder, or a medical condition for which 

of 4 12 at least two and a majority of relevant clinical studies suggest psilocybin therapy in a clinical 
environment is not safe.  
“Relevant clinical study” means a clinical study relevant to determining if a medical 
condition is a qualifying condition or a disqualifying condition. To be relevant to determining 
whether a medical condition is a qualifying condition or a disqualifying condition, a clinical 
study must examine psilocybin therapy specifically for that medical condition. For example, a 
phase 2 study of psilocybin therapy for post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD) is relevant to 
determining whether PTSD is a qualifying condition because the clinical trial is of psilocybin 
therapy for PTSD. On the other hand, a pilot study of psilocybin therapy for AIDS survivors that 
associates psilocybin therapy with reductions in PTSD symptoms is not relevant to determine 
whether PTSD is a qualifying condition because the clinical trial is of psilocybin therapy for 
AIDS survivors rather than for individuals diagnosed with PTSD.  
“Relevant clinical studies” means clinical studies relevant to determining if a medical 
condition is a qualifying condition or a disqualifying condition. To be relevant to determining 
whether a medical condition is a qualifying condition or a disqualifying condition, a clinical 
study must be a relevant clinical study as defined in this act. 
SECTION 2. Limitations. 
(a) Medical use of psilocybin and psilocin. This chapter shall not be construed to 
authorize, recognize, or endorse the medical use of psilocybin or psilocyn. This chapter shall not 
be construed to authorize, recognize, or endorse psilocybin or psilocyn as treatments for any 
medical condition. 

of 4 33  (b) Operating under the influence. This chapter does not amend existing penalties for 
operating, navigating or being in actual physical control of any motor vehicle, train, aircraft, 
motorboat or other motorized form of transport or machinery while impaired by psilocybin or 
psilocyn or for consuming psilocybin or psilocin while operating, navigating or being in actual 
physical control of any motor vehicle, train, aircraft, motorboat or other motorized form of 
transport or machinery.  
(c) Sale of psilocybin and psilocyn. This chapter shall not be construed to permit the sale 
of psilocybin or psilocin under any circumstances. 
SECTION 4. Public education. 
The Department of Public Health must publish and maintain a publicly accessible 
explanation of this act and the risks of personal psilocybin use on its website within 90 days of 
this chapter becoming law. The explanation must include a list of qualifying conditions and a list 
of disqualifying conditions that cite relevant clinical studies. The explanation must clearly state 
that the state of Massachusetts does not authorize, recognize, or endorse psilocybin or psilocyn 
as treatments for any medical condition. The Department of Public Health must subsequently 
update this explanation on an annual basis, incorporating relevant new evidence.  
SECTION 5. Removing certain criminal penalties for veterans, law enforcement officers, 
and individuals with qualifying conditions and without disqualifying conditions 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all of the following shall be 
lawful for a person 21 years of age or older who is not professionally, medically diagnosed with 
a disqualifying condition and who is a US veteran, current or former US law enforcement 
officer, or someone professionally, medically diagnosed with a qualifying condition: the 

of 4 55 possession, ingestion, obtaining, growing, and transportation of no more than two grams of 
psilocybin and psilocyn, excluding the weight of any material such as water, plant, and fungi 
material of which the substance is a part or to which the substance is added, dissolved, held in 
solution, or suspended.  
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all of the following shall be 
lawful for a person 21 years of age or older who is not professionally, medically diagnosed with 
a disqualifying condition and who is a US veteran, current or former US law enforcement 
officer, or someone professionally, medically diagnosed with a qualifying condition: giving 
away or otherwise transferring without remuneration not more than 50 grams of dried psilocybin 
mushrooms or half a gram of psilocybin and psilocyn, excluding the weight of any material such 
as water, plant, and fungi material of which the substance is a part or to which the substance is 
added, dissolved, held in solution, or suspended, to a person 21 years of age or older who is not 
professionally, medically diagnosed with a disqualifying condition and who is a US veteran, 
current or former US law enforcement officer, or someone professionally, medically diagnosed 
with a qualifying condition. 
SECTION 6. Conditional repeal. 30 days after psilocybin becomes a Schedule Ⅱ drug, 
the above section 5 of this chapter will no longer be in effect.